South Dakota, session 2026, HB1101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 58-1:
An insurer may not:
(1) Decline or limit coverage of an individual under any life, disability, or long-term
care insurance policy solely due to the status of the individual as a living organ
donor;
(2) Condition the continuation of a life, disability, or long-term care insurance policy
on an insured individual not becoming a living organ donor; or
(3) Otherwise discriminate in the offering, issuance, cancellation, amount of coverage,
price, or any other condition of a life, disability, or long-term care insurance policy
based solely, and without any additional actuarial risk, upon the status of an
individual as a living organ donor.
For purposes of this section, "living organ donor" means an individual who has
donated all or part of an organ and is not deceased.

26.340.10 2 1101
An Act to prohibit an insurer from declining or limiting life, disability, or long-term care
insurance policies based solely on an individual's status as a living organ donor.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1101
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1101 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1101 ENROLLED